West Virginia, session 2025, SB307.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. Authorization for Department of Administration to promulgate legislative rules. §64-2-1. Information Services and Communications Divisions. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on November 12, 2024, authorized under the authority of §5A-7-4 of this code, relating to the Information Services and Communications Divisions (telecommunications payments by spending units, 161 CSR 02), is authorized.